Louisiana, session 2026, HB385.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:5004 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§5004. Repayment; rules
A.(1) Except as provided in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, a student shall
repay award amounts paid to a postsecondary education institution on his behalf if
his award is suspended or canceled for failure to meet requirements for maintaining
eligibility as provided in R.S. 17:5041 and 5042.
(2) The following students are exempt from the repayment requirement in
Paragraph (1) of this Subsection:
(a) A student who initially qualified for an Honors or Excellence award.
(b) A student who enrolls during the same semester as the suspension or
cancellation or the semester immediately following the suspension or cancellation
at an institution under the supervision and management of the Board of Supervisors
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-597 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 385
of Community and Technical Colleges in a high-wage, high-demand program
determined to be a "qualified program" as provided in R.S. 17:3047.1.
B. The administering agency shall promulgate rules necessary to implement
the provisions of this Section. Such rules shall include the following:
(1) Provision for all available means of collecting amounts owed and interest
on unpaid amounts.
(2) Provision for circumstances under which a student shall be excepted from
the repayment requirement in Paragraph (A)(1) of this Section in addition to the
exceptions provided in Paragraph (A)(2) of this Section. Such rules shall provide for
the definition, certification requirements, and maximum duration of such
circumstances, which shall be limited to the following:
(a) Parental leave.
(b) Physical rehabilitation program.
(c) Substance abuse rehabilitation program.
(d) Temporary disability.
(e) Permanent disability.
(f) Exceptional educational opportunity.
(g) Religious commitment.
(h) Death of immediate family.
(i) Military service.
(j) Transfer to a selective enrollment program.
(k) Unavailability of courses.
(l) Natural disaster.
(m) Exceptional circumstances.
C. The provisions of this Section shall apply to students who graduate from
high school during or after the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-597 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 385